Wyoming, session 2026, SF0053.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-25-401 is created to read:
ARTICLE 4
AMATEUR STATUS REQUIRED FOR STUDENT ELIGIBILITY
21-25-401. Amateur status requirements.
(a) A student who represents a Wyoming high school in
a sport or activity sanctioned by the Wyoming high school
activities association shall be an amateur in that sport or
activity as provided in this section.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of
this section, a student forfeits amateur status in a sport
or activity by:
(i) Competing for or accepting money or other
monetary compensation for competing in that sport or
activity;
(ii) Receiving any award or prize of monetary
value for competing in that sport or activity that exceeds
the amount that has been approved by the Wyoming high
school activities association;
(iii) Capitalizing on the student's athletic
fame or the student's name, image or likeness by receiving
money, gifts of monetary value, merchandise or other
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
consideration related to competing in that sport or
activity;
(iv) Signing a professional playing contract in
that sport or activity. This paragraph shall not prohibit
signing a letter of intent or similar document to commit to
a college, provided that no compensation is paid in any
manner while the student is participating in the sport or
activity.
(c) The following activities do not forfeit amateur
status under this section:
(i) Accepting money or other monetary
compensation provided by a family member to a student to
encourage the student to participate in the sport or
activity;
(ii) Accepting money or other monetary
compensation for the time required for participation in the
sport or activity in a competition, camp or event that is
not sanctioned by the Wyoming high school activities
association if the amount of the payment does not exceed an
amount specified by the Wyoming high school activities
association. If prize money is available in the
competition, the student or the student's parent or
guardian shall complete a written declaration prior to the
competition that specifies that the student, and the
student's parent or guardian if applicable, will not accept
any prize money and will only accept awards that do not
exceed the awards amount authorized by the Wyoming high
school activities association. This paragraph shall not
authorize the payment of any money or monetary compensation
that is contingent upon the student's or the team's finish
or performance or that is given as an incentive to achieve
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
a specific goal or performance. Nothing in this paragraph
shall be deemed to authorize the payment of any money or
monetary compensation for participating in events
sanctioned by the Wyoming high school activities
association or for competing for or on behalf of a Wyoming
high school;
(iii) Accepting necessary meals, lodging and
transportation to play in a competition for a sport or
activity;
(iv) Accepting a nominal fee or salary for
instructing, supervising or officiating in an organized
youth sports program, recreation or playground activity;
(v) A school sponsored membership or fee that is
paid for the student to participate in a youth serving
agency, athletic club, community recreation center,
instructional program, camp or similar program if the fee
is paid directly to the program or agency;
(vi) Receiving an award, playing equipment,
prize of monetary value or other consideration that does
not exceed the awards amount authorized by the Wyoming high
school activities association;
(vii) Receiving nonmonetary benefits or awards
provided to members of an Olympic team or junior national
team beyond actual and necessary expenses, including
entertainment, equipment, clothing, long distance telephone
service, internet access and any other item or service for
which it can be demonstrated that the same benefit is
available to all members of the nation's Olympic or junior
national team or the specific Olympic or junior national
team in question;
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
(viii) Accepting funds that are administered by
the United States Olympic committee pursuant to its
operation gold program;
(ix) Participating in member school, charitable
or educational promotions or fund raising activities that
involve the use of athletic ability by student-athletes to
obtain funds from donors, including swim-a-thons,
lift-a-thons, shoot-a-thons or other similar events,
provided no compensation or prizes are given to the
student-athletes based on their performance. Items that are
provided to indicate participation in the activity
including shirts, bags or other similar items shall not
waive amateur status if the items are offered to every
student-athlete involved;
(x) Accepting scholarship funds, provided the
funds are paid directly to a postsecondary institution and
the funds are not available until after the student has
graduated from high school.
(d) Violation of this section shall result in the
student becoming ineligible to participate in the sport or
activity concerned.
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0053
ENROLLED ACT NO. 24, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
5